Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 4. Immediate Custody, Arrest, Detention and Shelter Care.
§ 16.1-253.
Preliminary protective order.

Upon the motion of any person or upon the court’s own motion, the court may issue a preliminary protective order, after a hearing, if necessary to protect a child’s life, health, safety or normal development pending the final determination of any matter before the court. The order may require a child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian, other person standing in loco parentis or other family or household member of the child to observe reasonable conditions of behavior for a specified length of time. These conditions shall include any one or more of the following:

To abstain from offensive conduct against the child, a family or household member of the child or any person to whom custody of the child is awarded;

To cooperate in the provision of reasonable services or programs designed to protect the child’s life, health or normal development;

To allow persons named by the court to come into the child’s home at reasonable times designated by the court to visit the child or inspect the fitness of the home and to determine the physical or emotional health of the child;

To allow visitation with the child by persons entitled thereto, as determined by the court;

To refrain from acts of commission or omission which tend to endanger the child’s life, health or normal development;

To refrain from such contact with the child or family or household members of the child, as the court may deem appropriate, including removal of such person from the residence of the child. However, prior to the issuance by the court of an order removing such person from the residence of the child, the petitioner must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that such person’s probable future conduct would constitute a danger to the life or health of such child, and that there are no less drastic alternatives which could reasonably and adequately protect the child’s life or health pending a final determination on the petition; or

To grant the person on whose behalf the order is issued the possession of any companion animal as defined in § 3.2-6500 if such person meets the definition of owner in § 3.2-6500.

A preliminary protective order may be issued ex parte upon motion of any person or the court’s own motion in any matter before the court, or upon petition. The motion or petition shall be supported by an affidavit or by sworn testimony in person before the judge or intake officer which establishes that the child would be subjected to an imminent threat to life or health to the extent that delay for the provision of an adversary hearing would be likely to result in serious or irremediable injury to the child’s life or health. If an ex parte order is issued without an affidavit being presented, the court, in its order, shall state the basis upon which the order was entered, including a summary of the allegations made and the court’s findings. Following the issuance of an ex parte order the court shall provide an adversary hearing to the affected parties within the shortest practicable time not to exceed five business days after the issuance of the order.

Prior to the hearing required by this section, notice of the hearing shall be given at least 24 hours in advance of the hearing to the guardian ad litem for the child, to the parents, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis of the child, to any other family or household member of the child to whom the protective order may be directed and to the child if he or she is 12 years of age or older. The notice provided herein shall include (i) the time, date and place for the hearing and (ii) a specific statement of the factual circumstances which allegedly necessitate the issuance of a preliminary protective order.

All parties to the hearing shall be informed of their right to counsel pursuant to §

16.1-266

.

At the hearing the child, his or her parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis and any other family or household member of the child to whom notice was given shall have the right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses and evidence and to present evidence on their own behalf.

If a petition alleging abuse or neglect of a child has been filed, at the hearing pursuant to this section the court shall determine whether the allegations of abuse or neglect have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Any finding of abuse or neglect shall be stated in the court order. However, if, before such a finding is made, a person responsible for the care and custody of the child, the child’s guardian ad litem or the local department of social services objects to a finding being made at the hearing, the court shall schedule an adjudicatory hearing to be held within 30 days of the date of the initial preliminary protective order hearing. The adjudicatory hearing shall be held to determine whether the allegations of abuse and neglect have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Parties who are present at the hearing shall be given notice of the date set for the adjudicatory hearing and parties who are not present shall be summoned as provided in §

16.1-263

. The adjudicatory hearing shall be held and an order may be entered, although a party to the hearing fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the person, or the court determines that such person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort.Any preliminary protective order issued shall remain in full force and effect pending the adjudicatory hearing.

If at the preliminary protective order hearing held pursuant to this section the court makes a finding of abuse or neglect and a preliminary protective order is issued, a dispositional hearing shall be held pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

. The court shall forthwith, but in all cases no later than the end of the business day on which the order was issued, enter and transfer electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court. A copy of the preliminary protective order containing any such identifying information shall be forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders. Upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department of State Police pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

and due return made to the court. However, if the order is issued by the circuit court, the clerk of the circuit court shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order containing the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders and upon receipt of the order, the primary law-enforcement agency shall enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith upon the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

. Upon service, the agency making service shall enter the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court. The preliminary order shall specify a date for the dispositional hearing. The dispositional hearing shall be scheduled at the time of the hearing pursuant to this section, and shall be held within 60 days of this hearing. If an adjudicatory hearing is requested pursuant to subsection F, the dispositional hearing shall nonetheless be scheduled at the hearing pursuant to this section. All parties present at the hearing shall be given notice of the date and time scheduled for the dispositional hearing; parties who are not present shall be summoned to appear as provided in §

16.1-263

.

Nothing in this section enables the court to remove a child from the custody of his or her parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis, except as provided in §

16.1-278.2

, and no order hereunder shall be entered against a person over whom the court does not have jurisdiction.

Neither a law-enforcement agency, the attorney for the Commonwealth, a court nor the clerk’s office, nor any employee of them, may disclose, except among themselves, the residential address, telephone number, or place of employment of the person protected by the order or that of the family of such person, except to the extent that disclosure is (i) required by law or the Rules of the Supreme Court, (ii) necessary for law-enforcement purposes, or (iii) permitted by the court for good cause.

Violation of any order issued pursuant to this section shall be punishable as contempt of court. However, if the violation involves an act or acts of commission or omission that endanger the child’s life or health or result in bodily injury to the child, it shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The court shall forthwith, but in all cases no later than the end of the business day on which the order was issued, enter and transfer electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court. A copy of the preliminary protective order containing any such identifying information shall be forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders. Upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

and due return made to the court. However, if the order is issued by the circuit court, the clerk of the circuit court shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order containing the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders and upon receipt of the order, the primary law-enforcement agency shall enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

. Upon service, the agency making service shall enter the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court. The preliminary order shall specify a date for the full hearing.Upon receipt of the return of service or other proof of service pursuant to subsection C of § 16.1-264, the clerk shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the preliminary protective order to the primary law-enforcement agency and the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above. If the order is later dissolved or modified, a copy of the dissolution or modification order shall also be attested, forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders, and upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above and the order shall be served forthwith and due return made to the court.

No fee shall be charged for filing or serving any petition or order pursuant to this section.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1985, c. 595; 1986, c. 308; 1987, c. 497; 1996, c. 866; 1997, c. 790; 1998, c. 550; 2002, cc. 508, 810, 818; 2008, cc. 73, 246; 2009, c. 732; 2013, c. 130; 2014, c. 346; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 184, 529.

Cross references.

As to testimony of child by use of two-way closed-circuit television in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1521

. As to admission of out-of-court statements made by certain children in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1522

. As to use of videotaped statements of certain children who are complaining witnesses in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1523

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 130, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2014, c. 346, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 529, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall supersede and control any provision of Chapter 184 of the Acts of Assembly of 2021, Special Session I.”

The 1998 amendment

inserted “safety,” substituted “any matter before the court” for “a petition filed under this law” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “motion of any person or the court’s own motion in any matter before the court, or upon” for “a” in the first sentence, added “The motion or petition shall be” in the second sentence and inserted the present next-to-last sentence; substituted “protective order” for “removal” in the third sentence of subsection F; in subsection G, inserted “preliminary protective order” in the first sentence and inserted “and time” in the last sentence; and inserted “except as provided in §

16.1-278.2

” in subsection H.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 508 added subsection I; redesignated former subsection I as subsection J; and added subsections K and L.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and inserted the second through fifth sentences in subsection G.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 73 and 246 are identical, and rewrote subsections G and K; added subsection M; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 732, in subsection G, in the second sentence, inserted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person,” and deleted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network” from the end, in the third sentence, deleted “and an addendum” preceding “containing any such,” in the fourth sentence, deleted “and addendum” preceding “by the primary,” in the fifth sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “copy of the order” and “receipt of the order” inserted “the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court”; in subsection K, in the first sentence, inserted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person,” and deleted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network” from the end, in the second sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “protective order,” in the third sentence, deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order,” in the fourth sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “copy of the order,” inserted “the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court” and deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order”; and deleted subsection M, which read: “If any identifying information in the addendum is determined to be incorrect by the entering agency, the agency shall enter the corrected information into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “60 days” for “75 days” in the eighth sentence of subsection G.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 346 added subdivision A 7 and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 184 and 529, effective July 1, 2021, are nearly identical, and in subsection J, substituted “be punishable as” for “constitute” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

§ 16.1-253.1.
Preliminary protective orders in cases of family abuse; confidentiality.

Upon the filing of a petition alleging that the petitioner is or has been, within a reasonable period of time, subjected to family abuse, the court may issue a preliminary protective order against an allegedly abusing person in order to protect the health and safety of the petitioner or any family or household member of the petitioner. The order may be issued in an ex parte proceeding upon good cause shown when the petition is supported by an affidavit or sworn testimony before the judge or intake officer. If an ex parte order is issued without an affidavit or a completed form as prescribed by subsection D of §

16.1-253.4

being presented, the court, in its order, shall state the basis upon which the order was entered, including a summary of the allegations made and the court’s findings. Immediate and present danger of family abuse or evidence sufficient to establish probable cause that family abuse has recently occurred shall constitute good cause. Evidence that the petitioner has been subjected to family abuse within a reasonable time and evidence of immediate and present danger of family abuse may be established by a showing that (i) the allegedly abusing person is incarcerated and is to be released from incarceration within 30 days following the petition or has been released from incarceration within 30 days prior to the petition, (ii) the crime for which the allegedly abusing person was convicted and incarcerated involved family abuse against the petitioner, and (iii) the allegedly abusing person has made threatening contact with the petitioner while he was incarcerated, exhibiting a renewed threat to the petitioner of family abuse.A preliminary protective order may include any one or more of the following conditions to be imposed on the allegedly abusing person:

Prohibiting acts of family abuse or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property.

Prohibiting such contacts by the respondent with the petitioner or family or household members of the petitioner as the court deems necessary for the health or safety of such persons.

Granting the petitioner possession of the premises occupied by the parties to the exclusion of the allegedly abusing person; however, no such grant of possession shall affect title to any real or personal property.

Enjoining the respondent from terminating any necessary utility service to a premises that the petitioner has been granted possession of pursuant to subdivision 3 or, where appropriate, ordering the respondent to restore utility services to such premises.

Granting the petitioner and, where appropriate, any other family or household member of the petitioner, exclusive use and possession of a cellular telephone number or electronic device. The court may enjoin the respondent from terminating a cellular telephone number or electronic device before the expiration of the contract term with a third-party provider. The court may enjoin the respondent from using a cellular telephone or other electronic device to locate the petitioner.

Granting the petitioner temporary possession or use of a motor vehicle owned by the petitioner alone or jointly owned by the parties to the exclusion of the allegedly abusing person; however, no such grant of possession or use shall affect title to the vehicle.

Requiring that the allegedly abusing person provide suitable alternative housing for the petitioner and any other family or household member and, where appropriate, requiring the respondent to pay deposits to connect or restore necessary utility services in the alternative housing provided.

Granting the petitioner the possession of any companion animal as defined in § 3.2-6500 if such petitioner meets the definition of owner in § 3.2-6500.

Any other relief necessary for the protection of the petitioner and family or household members of the petitioner.

The court shall forthwith, but in all cases no later than the end of the business day on which the order was issued, enter and transfer electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court. A copy of a preliminary protective order containing any such identifying information shall be forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders. Upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

and due return made to the court. However, if the order is issued by the circuit court, the clerk of the circuit court shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order containing the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders and upon receipt of the order, the primary law-enforcement agency shall enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the allegedly abusing person in person as provided in §

16.1-264

. Upon service, the agency making service shall enter the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court. The preliminary order shall specify a date for the full hearing. The hearing shall be held within 15 days of the issuance of the preliminary order, unless the court is closed pursuant to §

16.1-69.35

or

17.1-207

and such closure prevents the hearing from being held within such time period, in which case the hearing shall be held on the next day not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. If such court is closed pursuant to §

16.1-69.35

or

17.1-207

, the preliminary protective order shall remain in full force and effect until it is dissolved by such court, until another preliminary protective order is entered, or until a protective order is entered. If the respondent fails to appear at this hearing because the respondent was not personally served, or if personally served was incarcerated and not transported to the hearing, the court may extend the protective order for a period not to exceed six months. The extended protective order shall be served forthwith on the respondent. However, upon motion of the respondent and for good cause shown, the court may continue the hearing. The preliminary order shall remain in effect until the hearing. Upon request after the order is issued, the clerk shall provide the petitioner with a copy of the order and information regarding the date and time of service. The order shall further specify that either party may at any time file a motion with the court requesting a hearing to dissolve or modify the order. The hearing on the motion shall be given precedence on the docket of the court. Upon petitioner’s motion to dissolve the preliminary protective order, a dissolution order may be issued ex parte by the court with or without a hearing. If an ex parte hearing is held, it shall be heard by the court as soon as practicable. If a dissolution order is issued ex parte, the court shall serve a copy of such dissolution order on respondent in conformity with §§

8.01-286.1

and

8.01-296

.Upon receipt of the return of service or other proof of service pursuant to subsection C of § 16.1-264, the clerk shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the preliminary protective order to the primary law-enforcement agency, and the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above. If the order is later dissolved or modified, a copy of the dissolution or modification order shall also be attested, forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders, and upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above and the order shall be served forthwith and due return made to the court.

The preliminary order is effective upon personal service on the allegedly abusing person. Except as otherwise provided in §

16.1-253.2

, a violation of the order shall constitute contempt of court.

At a full hearing on the petition, the court may issue a protective order pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

if the court finds that the petitioner has proven the allegation of family abuse by a preponderance of the evidence.

Neither a law-enforcement agency, the attorney for the Commonwealth, a court nor the clerk’s office, nor any employee of them, may disclose, except among themselves, the residential address, telephone number, or place of employment of the person protected by the order or that of the family of such person, except to the extent that disclosure is (i) required by law or the Rules of the Supreme Court, (ii) necessary for law-enforcement purposes, or (iii) permitted by the court for good cause.

As used in this section, “copy” includes a facsimile copy.

No fee shall be charged for filing or serving any petition or order pursuant to this section.

Upon issuance of a preliminary protective order, the clerk of the court shall make available to the petitioner information that is published by the Department of Criminal Justice Services for victims of domestic violence or for petitioners in protective order cases.

History.

1984, c. 631; 1987, c. 497; 1988, c. 165; 1992, c. 886; 1994, c. 907; 1996, c. 866; 1997, c. 603; 1998, c. 684; 2000, cc. 34, 654; 2001, c. 101; 2002, cc. 508, 810, 818; 2006, c. 308; 2007, c. 205; 2008, cc. 73, 246; 2009, cc. 343, 732; 2011, cc. 445, 480; 2014, c. 346; 2018, cc. 38, 652; 2019, cc. 197, 718; 2020, c. 137.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 346, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, substituted “Virginia criminal information network” for “Virginia crime information network” throughout, in the first paragraph, added the present second sentence and substituted “either party” for “the person served” in the present next-to-last sentence, and inserted “subsection C of” in the first sentence of the second paragraph; and added subsection E.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 34 and 654 are identical, and inserted “owned by the petitioner alone or” in subdivision A 5.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 101 added the sixth and seventh sentences in subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 508, in subsection B, substituted “Upon” for “As soon as practicable after” at the beginning of the first paragraph and substituted “shall, upon receipt” for “shall, on the date of receipt” in the first sentence of the second paragraph; inserted present subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as present subsection F; and added subsection G.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and in the first paragraph in subsection B, substituted “Upon” for “As soon as practicable after” in the first sentence and deleted “feasible and” preceding “practical” in the second sentence; and substituted “shall, upon” for “shall, on the date of” in the first sentence in the second paragraph in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 308 inserted subdivisions A 5 and A 8; redesignated subdivisions A 5 and A 6 as subdivisions A 6 and A 7; and inserted “requiring the respondent to pay deposits to connect or restore necessary utility services in the alternative housing provided” at the end of subdivision 7.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 205 inserted the present sixth and seventh sentences of subsection B and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 73 and 246 are identical, and rewrote subsection B and added subsection H.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 343, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, added the last sentence; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, in the seventh sentence, inserted “or if personally served was incarcerated and not transported to the hearing.”

The 2009 amendment by c. 732, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person,” and deleted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network” from the end, in the second sentence, deleted “and an addendum” preceding “containing any such,” in the third sentence, deleted “and addendum” preceding “by the primary,” in the fourth sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “copy of the order,” inserted “the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court” and deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order”;
and deleted subsection H, which read: “If any identifying information in the addendum is determined to be incorrect by the entering agency, the agency shall enter the corrected information into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 445 and 480 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, added “or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property”; rewrote subdivision A 2, which read: “Prohibiting such other contacts between the parties as the court deems appropriate”; and deleted subdivision A 3, which read: “Prohibiting such other contacts with the allegedly abused family or household member as the court deems necessary to protect the safety of such persons,” redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly and made a related reference change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 346 added subdivision A 7 and redesignated former A 7 as A 8.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 38 added subdivision A 5, and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2018 amendment by c. 652 added subsection H.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 197 inserted “unless the court is closed pursuant to §

16.1-69.35

or

17.1-207

and such closure prevents the hearing from being held within such time period, in which case the hearing shall be held on the next day not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. If such court is closed pursuant to §

16.1-69.35

or

17.1-207

, the preliminary protective order shall remain in full force and effect until it is dissolved by such court, until another preliminary protective order is entered, or until a protective order is entered” in the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2019 amendment by c. 718, in subsection A, inserted “If an ex parte order is issued without an affidavit or a completed form as prescribed by subsection D of §

16.1-253.4

being presented, the court, in its order, shall state the basis upon which the order was entered, including a summary of the allegations made and the court’s findings.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 137 added the last three sentences in the first paragraph of subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article, “Domestic Relations,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (1997).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For article, “Making the Case to Avoid Entering the eBay Marketplace: A Recommended Analytical Framework for Evaluating Requests for Permanent Injunctions in Virginia,” see 32 Regent U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).